Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. Purposes and License.

Sec. 10.13.010.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to

promote economic development by encouraging the formation of one or more BIDCOs to help meet the financing assistance and management assistance needs of businesses in the state;

establish a system of licensing, regulation, and enforcement to enable a BIDCO to satisfy the eligibility requirements for participating in programs that further the purposes of the BIDCO;

encourage capital sources to invest in and lend money to BIDCOs by providing for BIDCOs a system of licensing, regulation, and enforcement designed to prevent fraud, conflict of interest, and mismanagement, and to promote competent management, accurate record keeping, and appropriate communication with shareholders;

safeguard the general reputation of BIDCOs in order to increase the confidence of prospective equity investors in and prospective debt sources for BIDCOs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.020.
Qualifications for BIDCO license.

The department shall issue a license to operate as a BIDCO to a corporation that is incorporated under AS 10.06, or that has been issued a certificate of authority under AS 10.06 to transact business in the state, and that submits an application to the department, if the department determines that

the applicant has the net worth required under AS

10.13.040

;

the directors, officers, and controlling persons of the applicant satisfy the criteria under AS

10.13.050

;

it is reasonable to believe that the corporation will comply with this chapter;

the applicant has a reasonable promise of being a viable, ongoing BIDCO, satisfying the basic objectives of the corporation’s business plans, and achieving long-term financial success.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.030.
Application procedure.

When applying for a license, an applicant shall provide the information required by the department in the form required by the department. The information must include information on the directors, officers, and controlling persons of the applicant, the applicant’s business plan, including at least 10 years of detailed financial projections and other relevant information, and additional information considered relevant by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.040.
Requisite net worth.

In order to receive a license, an applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant has raised sufficient capital so that

the net worth of the BIDCO is expected to be adequate, in the context of its business plan, to support the BIDCO’s management team and to achieve an appropriate spreading of the risk involved in the BIDCO’s provisions of financing assistance; and

the BIDCO has a reasonable promise of being a viable, ongoing BIDCO, satisfying the basic objectives of its business plan and achieving long-term financial success.

The department may not establish a minimum net worth for a BIDCO under this section of less than $1,500,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, rewrote (b), which read, “Unless the BIDCO receives a loan under AS

37.17.500

– 37.17.690, the department may not establish a minimum net worth for a BIDCO under this section of less than $1,500,000. If the BIDCO, as part of its initial capitalization, receives a loan under AS

37.17.500

– 37.17.690. The minimum net worth of the BIDCO may be $500,000, excluding organization costs paid for or owed by the BIDCO.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 26, SLA 2018 (HB 340), which amended (b) of this section, see 2018 House Journal 2378.

Sec. 10.13.050.
Criteria for directors, officers, and controlling persons.

A license may only be issued if the department determines that each director, officer, and controlling person of the applicant is

of good character and sound financial standing;

competent to perform the director’s or officer’s functions for the applicant; and

when considered collectively with the other directors, officers, and controlling persons, adequate to manage the business of the applicant as a BIDCO.

The department may determine that a director, officer, or controlling person of an applicant is not of good character. Bases the department may use to make that determination include proof that the director, officer, or controlling person, or a director or officer of a controlling person has

had an administrative sanction imposed under 31 U.S.C. 3801 — 3812 (Program Fraud Civil Remedies Act of 1986) for an offense under 15 U.S.C. 645; or

been convicted of a crime involving fraud or dishonesty, including a conviction for an offense under 15 U.S.C. 645; in this paragraph, “conviction” includes a conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.060.
Determination of likelihood of future noncompliance.

The department may determine that it is not reasonable to believe that an applicant would comply with this chapter if licensed. Bases the department may use to make that determination include proof that the applicant has been convicted of a crime involving fraud or dishonesty, including a conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.070.
Denial of application.

If the department denies a license the department shall provide the applicant with a written statement explaining the reasons for the denial.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.080.
Display of license.

A licensee shall post the license in a conspicuous place in the licensee’s principal office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.090.
Transfer or assignment of license prohibited.

A licensee may not transfer or assign its license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.100.
Surrender of license.

Upon approval by a two-thirds vote of its board of directors and after complying with (b) and (c) of this section, a licensee may apply to the department to have the department accept the surrender of the licensee’s license. If the department determines that the requirements of this section have been satisfied, the department shall approve the application unless the department determines that the purpose of the application is to evade a current or prospective action by the department under AS

10.13.700

—

10.13.830

.

Not less than 60 days before filing an application under (a) of this section, a licensee shall notify all of its shareholders and creditors of its intention to file the application. Each creditor shall be notified of the right to comment to the department. Each shareholder shall be notified of the right to file with the licensee an objection to the proposed surrender of the license within the 60-day period and shall be advised that, if the shareholder files an objection, the shareholder may also send a copy of the objection to the department.

If shareholders representing 20 percent of the outstanding voting securities of the licensee file an objection with the licensee, the licensee may not proceed with the application unless the application is approved by a vote of shareholders representing two-thirds of the outstanding voting securities of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)